North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-15 Pharmacists
43-15-10.
Powers of board. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In addition to other powers provided by law, the board shall have the following powers and duties, which shall be exercised in conformity with chapter 28-32 in order to protect the public health, welfare, and safety:

To place on probation, reprimand, or fine any pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician; or refuse to issue or renew, or suspend, revoke, restrict, or cancel, the license, permit, or registration of any pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician, if any of the following grounds apply and the pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician:

Is addicted to any alcohol or drug habit.

Uses any advertising statements of a character tending to deceive or mislead the public.

Is subject to drug or alcohol dependency or abuse.

Permits or engages in the unauthorized sale of narcotic drugs or controlled substances.

Permits or engages an unauthorized person to practice pharmacy.

Is mentally or physically incompetent to handle pharmaceutical duties.

Is guilty of fraud, deception, or misrepresentation in passing the pharmacist examination.

Is found by the board in violation of any of the provisions of the laws regulating drugs, pharmacies, and pharmacists or interns and technicians or the rules and regulations established by the board.

Is found to have engaged in unprofessional conduct as that term is defined by the rules of the board.

Is subject to incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public.

Is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of one or more of the following:

A felony, as defined by the statutes of North Dakota.

Any act involving moral turpitude or gross immorality.

Violations of the pharmacy or the drug laws of North Dakota or rules and regulations pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of any other state, or of the federal government.

Commits fraud or intentional misrepresentation in securing the issuance or renewal of a license or pharmacy permit.

Sells, dispenses, or compounds any drug while on duty and while under the influence of alcohol or while under the influence of a controlled substance without a practitioner’s prescription.

Discloses confidential information to any person, except as authorized by law.

To prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter governing the cancellation or suspension of a license.

To examine and license as pharmacist any applicant found entitled to such license.

To prescribe rules and regulations for the guidance of its members, officers, and employees, and to ensure the proper and orderly dispatch of its business.

To employ and pay such persons as it may deem necessary to inspect pharmacies in this state, investigate pharmacies for the information of the board, procure evidence in any proceeding pending before the board, or procure evidence in aid of any prosecution or action in any court commenced or about to be commenced by or against the board in relation to any matter in which the board has any duty to perform.

To employ and pay counsel to advise the board or to prosecute or defend any action or proceeding commenced by or against the board or pending before it.

To grant permits and renewals thereof for the establishment and operation of pharmacies.

Only for good cause to cancel, revoke, or suspend permits and renewals thereof for the establishment and operation of pharmacies.

To prescribe reasonable and nondiscriminatory rules and regulations in regard to granting, renewing, canceling, revoking, or suspending permits and renewals for establishing and operating pharmacies.

Action by the board canceling, revoking, suspending, or refusing to renew a permit to establish or operate a pharmacy shall not be enforced for thirty days after notice has been given an aggrieved party by the board, nor during the time that an appeal by such aggrieved party is pending and until such appeal is finally determined.

To prescribe reasonable rules and regulations relating to the physical design of space occupied by a pharmacy to ensure appropriate control of and safeguards over the contents of such pharmacy.

To regulate and control the practice of pharmacy in North Dakota.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules for the regulation of pharmacies and pharmacists providing radiopharmaceutical services, including special training, education, and experience for pharmacists and physical design of space, safeguards, and equipment for pharmacies.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules determined necessary by the board for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter, chapter 19-02.1 as that chapter pertains to drugs, subject to approval of the director of the department of health and human services, and chapter 19-03.1.

The board or its authorized representatives may investigate and gather evidence concerning alleged violations of the provisions of chapter 43-15, chapter 19-02.1 that pertains to drugs, chapters 19-03.1, 19-03.2, and 19-04, or of the rules of the board. Board investigative files are confidential and may not be considered public records or open records for purposes of section 44-04-18, until a complaint is filed or a decision made by the board not to file a complaint.

In addition to other remedies, the board may apply to the district court in the jurisdiction of an alleged violation, and that court has jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of chapter 43-15, chapter 19-02.1 pertaining to drugs, and chapter 19-03.1, whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law. Whenever a duly authorized representative of the board finds or has probable cause to believe that any drug or device is adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, within the meaning of chapter 19-02.1, the representative shall affix to that drug or device a tag or other appropriate marking giving notice that the article is or is suspected of being adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, has been detained or embargoed and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until provision for removal or disposal is given by the board or its agents or the court. No person may remove or dispose of such embargoed drug or device by sale or otherwise without the permission of the board or its agent, or, after summary proceedings have been instituted, without permission from the court.

When a drug or device detained or embargoed has been declared by such representative to be adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, the board shall, as soon as practical thereafter, petition the district court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for an order for condemnation of such article. If the judge determines that the drug or device so detained or embargoed is not adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, the board shall direct the immediate removal of the tag or other marking. If the court finds the detained or embargoed drug or device is adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, such drug or device, after entry of the decree, shall be destroyed at the expense of the owner under the supervision of a board representative and all court costs and fees, storage, and other proper expense shall be borne by the owner of such drug or device. When the adulteration, misbranding, mislabeling, or improper identification can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the drug or device, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond has been posted, may direct that such drug or device be delivered to the owner for labeling or processing under the supervision of a board representative. Expense of supervision shall be paid by the owner. Bond posted shall be returned to the owner of the drug or device on representation to the court by the board that the drug or device is no longer in violation of the embargo and the expense of supervision has been paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the board to report violations whenever the board believes the public’s interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

The board shall establish a bill of rights for patients concerning the health care services a patient may expect in regard to pharmaceutical care.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules as may be deemed necessary by the board to register pharmacy technicians pursuant to qualifications established by the board, to charge a pharmacy technician an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars, to specify tasks associated with and included in the practice of pharmacy which may be delegated by a licensed pharmacist to a registered pharmacy technician, to provide for suspension or revocation of a pharmacy technician’s registration, and to regulate and control pharmacy technicians. The board may allocate up to fifty percent of the amount of the registration fee to an appropriate pharmacy technician association for its general operating expenses, including pharmacy technician education and development standards.

To require the self-reporting by an applicant or a licensee of any information the board determines may indicate possible deficiencies in practice, performance, fitness, or qualifications.

To require information regarding an applicant’s or licensee’s fitness, qualifications, and previous professional record and performance from recognized data sources, including the national association of boards of pharmacy data bank, other data repositories, licensing and disciplinary authorities of other jurisdictions, professional education and training institutions, liability insurers, health care institutions, and law enforcement agencies be reported to the board. The board may require an applicant for licensure or a licensee who is the subject of a disciplinary investigation to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12-60-24. All costs associated with obtaining a background check are the responsibility of the licensee or applicant.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules as may be deemed necessary by the board to register veterinary dispensing technicians pursuant to qualifications established by the board, to charge a veterinary dispensing technician an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars, to provide for suspension or revocation of a veterinary dispensing technician’s registration, to provide for suspension or revocation of a veterinary retail facility’s license, to regulate and control veterinary retail facilities, and to regulate and control veterinary dispensing technicians.

To establish limited prescriptive authority for individuals to distribute opioid antagonist kits, also known as “Naloxone rescue kits.” If the board establishes limited prescriptive authority under this subsection, the board shall adopt rules to establish standards that may include training, certification, and continuing education requirements.

To establish limited prescriptive authority through a statewide protocol for public health issues within the scope of practice for a pharmacist. The board shall adopt rules to establish standards of care.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 5; 1893, ch. 80, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 285; R.C. 1899, § 285; R.C. 1905, § 304; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 6, 7; C.L. 1913, §§ 480, 481; S.L. 1937, ch. 193, §§ 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 43-1510; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 6; S.L. 1971, ch. 436, § 1; 1979, ch. 467, § 1; 1981, ch. 444, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 479, § 1; 1987, ch. 518, § 1; 1987, ch. 519, § 1; 1989, ch. 316, § 3; 1993, ch. 422, §§ 6, 7; 1995, ch. 217, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 405, § 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 22; 2007, ch. 363, § 3; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2011, ch. 311, § 2; 2015, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 360, effective September 1, 2022.

43-15-11.
Fees deposited with state treasurer — Separate fund — Vouchers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 510, § 15.

Note.

For present provisions on deposit and disbursement of funds of occupational and professional boards, see section 54-44-12.

43-15-12.
State board of pharmacy — Report.

The board may submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 11; 1893, ch. 80, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 290; R.C. 1899, § 290; R.C. 1905, § 311; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 20; C.L. 1913, § 494; R.C. 1943, § 43-1512; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 42; 1973, ch. 403, § 32; 1975, ch. 466, § 34; 1995, ch. 350, § 33; 2009, ch. 365, § 2.

43-15-13.
State board of pharmacy — When members may teach pharmacy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 407, § 1.

43-15-13.1.
North Dakota pharmaceutical association — How governed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-13.2.
Membership of North Dakota pharmaceutical association. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-13.3.
Rights of members of pharmaceutical association. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-13.4.
Moneys payable from board of pharmacy to North Dakota pharmaceutical association. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-13.5.
Method of expenditure of association’s funds — Annual report of receipts and disbursements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-13.6.
No liability upon state created by provisions of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-14.
Unlawful practice of pharmacy.

Applicability. No person may engage in the practice of pharmacy unless licensed to practice pharmacy under this chapter, except that a registered pharmacy technician may perform specific tasks delegated by and under the immediate personal supervision and control of a licensed pharmacist, as permitted under rules adopted by the board. Physicians or other practitioners as defined in this chapter who are licensed under the laws of this state may dispense and administer prescription drugs to their patients in the practice of their respective professions if specifically authorized to do so by state law.

Penalties. Any person who is found by the board to have unlawfully engaged in the practice of pharmacy is subject to a fine to be imposed by the board not to exceed one thousand dollars for each offense. Each violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter pertaining to unlawfully engaging in the practice of pharmacy also constitutes a class B misdemeanor.

A pharmacy or licensed pharmacist that utilizes the services of a registered pharmacy technician as permitted by the board, may not be considered as aiding and abetting an unauthorized person to practice pharmacy; provided, however, that the pharmacy or licensed pharmacist must retain responsibility for any act performed by a registered pharmacy technician in the course of the registered pharmacy technician’s employment.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 475; R.C. 1943, § 43-1514; S.L. 1957, ch. 300, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 43-1514; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 7; 1979, ch. 187, § 87; 1979, ch. 467, § 2; 1991, ch. 458, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 11; 1995, ch. 405, § 3.

Cross-References.

Controlled substances for care and treatment, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.3.

Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.5.

Sale of controlled substances, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.1.

Sale of poisons, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-04.

Collateral References.

“Brand name” or original-package nonprescription remedies, applicability of statutes prohibiting sales of medicines or drugs other than by pharmacists or pharmacies to, 98 A.L.R.2d 1063.

Physician’s liability to third person for prescribing drug to known drug addict, 42 A.L.R.4th 586.

43-15-15.
Qualifications of licensed pharmacist.

Every applicant for license as a pharmacist in this state shall have the following qualifications:

Be at least eighteen years of age.

Be of good moral character.

Be a graduate of a school or college of pharmacy recognized by the board as an approved school.

Any applicant who is a graduate of a school or college of pharmacy located outside the United States, whose school or college of pharmacy has not been recognized by the board as an approved school but who is otherwise qualified to apply for licensure to practice pharmacy in this state, may be deemed to have satisfied the requirements of subsection 3 by verification to the board of applicant’s academic record and applicant’s graduation and by meeting such other requirements as the board may establish from time to time. The board may require such applicant to successfully pass an examination or examinations given or approved by the board to establish proficiency in English and equivalency of education of such applicant with qualified graduates of a school or college recognized by the board as a prerequisite of taking the licensure examination provided for in section 43-15-19.

Before a license will be granted by the North Dakota board of pharmacy, the applicant must have practical experience for a term to be determined by the board in accordance with the requirements of the national association of boards of pharmacy in a retail pharmacy under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist, which experience must be predominantly work directly relating to selling drugs and poisons, compounding of pharmaceutical preparations and physicians’ prescriptions, keeping records, and making reports required under the state and federal statutes. Any employment of the applicant prior to the applicant’s completion of the first year of study in a college of pharmacy or its equivalent may not be applied in computing the fulfillment of this requirement.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 286; R.C. 1899, § 286; S.L. 1905, ch. 146, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 305; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 12; 1911, ch. 202, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 486; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 2; 1929, ch. 185, § 1; 1935, ch. 232, § 1; 1941, ch. 185, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1515; S.L. 1949, ch. 289, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 43-1515; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 8; 1963, ch. 309, § 1; 1973, ch. 120, § 46; 1973, ch. 350, § 1; 1983, ch. 478, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 12.

43-15-16.
Exception to qualificational requirements.

Any person qualified to take the examination for licensure as a pharmacist in this state under the law in effect prior to July 1, 1927, who failed to apply for the examination, upon due proof to the board that the person was so qualified and that the person is a bona fide resident of this state, may take the examination. Upon passing the examination in a manner satisfactory to the majority of the board, such person shall be given a license as a licensed pharmacist.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 185, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1516; 1993, ch. 422, § 13.

Collateral References.

“Grandfather clause” of statute or ordinance regulating or licensing business or occupation, 4 A.L.R.2d 667.

43-15-17.
Qualifications for assistant registered pharmacist. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 16.

43-15-18.
License of pharmacy intern.

To register in this state a pharmacy intern must have completed one year of college, be registered in a prepharmacy program, and must be employed by a licensed pharmacist. At the date of entering into internship, an intern shall file with the executive director of the board the following certificates accompanied by a fee set by the board:

An application stating the applicant has entered into an internship giving the intern’s name, residence, and educational qualifications.

A statement from the intern’s employer stating that the applicant will be employed by the pharmacist, as a pharmacy intern, that to the employer’s knowledge the applicant possesses the required education and qualifications.

The executive director of the board shall file the application and license the applicant as a pharmacy intern.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 135, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1905, §§ 308, 309; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 15; C.L. 1913, § 489; S.L. 1927, ch. 210, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1518; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 9; 1973, ch. 351, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 14; 1999, ch. 379, § 5.

43-15-18.1.
Conviction not bar to license — Exceptions.

Conviction of an offense does not disqualify a person from licensure under this chapter unless the board determines that the offense has a direct bearing upon a person’s ability to serve the public as a pharmacist or that, following conviction of any offense, the person is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 29; 1993, ch. 422, § 15.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

43-15-19.
Examination for license.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every applicant for licensure as a pharmacist, before receiving a license from the board, shall pass such an examination as to the applicant’s education and professional qualifications as the board shall prescribe.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 11; C.L. 1913, § 485; R.C. 1943, § 43-1519; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 3; 1993, ch. 422, § 16.

43-15-20.
Fees for examination.

Each applicant for licensure as a pharmacist in this state shall pay to the secretary of the board before examination a fee to be set by the board not to exceed three hundred dollars. If the applicant fails to pass a satisfactory examination, the applicant may be re-examined at any regular meeting of the board, upon the payment of a further fee to be set by the board not to exceed three hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, §§ 8, 9; 1893, ch. 80, § 3; R.C. 1895, §§ 287, 288; R.C. 1899, §§ 287, 288; S.L. 1903, ch. 136, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 306, 307; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 14; C.L. 1913, § 488; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 43-1520; S.L. 1957, ch. 301, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 43-1520; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 4; 1993, ch. 422, § 17.

43-15-21.
License — Issuance.

The board shall cause to be issued to each pharmacist in this state whom it finds entitled thereto, a license showing:

The date of issue.

The fact that the person to whom it was issued is a licensed pharmacist.

The residence of the person to whom the license was issued.

The license must be signed by a majority of the members of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 288; R.C. 1899, § 288; S.L. 1903, ch. 136, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 307; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 16; C.L. 1913, § 490; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 43-1521; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 5; 1993, ch. 422, § 18.

43-15-22.
Licensing without examination.

The board, without examination, may register and issue a license as a pharmacist to any person of good moral character who presents to the board satisfactory evidence that before coming to this state the applicant legally had been licensed as a pharmacist in another state or foreign country, in which the requirements for such license with respect to qualifications are equivalent to the requirements of this state, but the board need not recognize or accept such license, certificate, or registration as evidence of the applicant’s qualifications unless it is satisfied that the applicant is in fact qualified to be a pharmacist in this state. The board may deny recognition or acceptance of the license, certificate, or registration of any state or foreign country which does not accord similar recognition to licentiates of this state. A fee to be set by the board not to exceed three hundred dollars must be paid prior to licensing without examination as provided for herein.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 10; C.L. 1913, § 484; R.C. 1943, § 43-1522; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 6; 1993, ch. 422, § 19.

43-15-23.
Temporary certificate — How obtained.

The secretary of the board, or any member thereof, on request by the secretary in writing, may examine an applicant orally or in writing and issue a temporary certificate to practice pharmacy in this state. The certificate must authorize such practice and must be valid until the next meeting of the board. Only one temporary certificate may be issued to the same applicant, and no temporary certificate may be issued to any person whose application has been acted on by the board. The applicant for a temporary certificate shall pay to the person making the examination the same fee as is provided by this chapter for an examination by the board, and such fees when paid must be for the benefit of the said board and must be delivered to the secretary by the person making the examination.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 27; C.L. 1913, § 501; R.C. 1943, § 43-1523.

43-15-24.
Register.

The secretary of the board shall keep a record or register in which, in addition to such other matters as the board may require, the secretary shall register each certificate issued under the provisions of this chapter, the facts appearing in the certificate, and all cancellations or renewals of the certificate or changes therein.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 17; C.L. 1913, § 491; R.C. 1943, § 43-1524.

43-15-25.
Term of license — Renewal — Fee — Where displayed.

The license issued by the board to a pharmacist under this chapter, and the registration thereof, entitles the holder to act in the capacity therein stated for one year unless duly canceled, suspended, or revoked. Every licensee who desires to retain a license, on or before the first day of March in each year, shall pay to the secretary of the board a renewal fee in an amount to be fixed by the board not to exceed one hundred dollars. Upon payment of the fee, the board shall issue a renewal license. The license and renewal must be displayed in a conspicuous place in the pharmacy and drugstore where the holder is employed. After a licensee has held licenses duly issued over a period of fifty consecutive years, the secretary of the board may issue the licensee a lifetime license that entitles the licensee to act in the capacity of pharmacist thereafter without further payment unless the license is canceled, revoked, or suspended.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, §§ 9, 10; 1893, ch. 80, § 4; R.C. 1895, §§ 288, 289; R.C. 1899, §§ 288, 289; S.L. 1903, ch. 136, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 308, 310; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 16, 21; C.L. 1913, §§ 490, 495; S.L. 1927, ch, 211, §§ 5, 7; R.C. 1943, § 43-1525; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 10; 1963, ch. 310, § 1; 1973, ch. 352, § 1; 1979, ch. 467, § 7; 1993, ch. 422, § 20; 2009, ch. 365, § 3.

43-15-25.1.
Continuing pharmaceutical education.

Each pharmacist shall complete at least fifteen hours of approved continuing pharmaceutical education every year as a condition of renewal of a certificate of licensure as a pharmacist in this state.

An annual renewal of a license may not be issued to a pharmacist until the pharmacist has satisfactorily completed an accredited program of continuing professional education, all of which may be home self-study, during the previous year to help assure the pharmacist’s continued competence to engage in the practice of pharmacy. The board from time to time shall determine the amount of continuing education to be required, not to exceed fifteen hours in each annual period. Upon request of the board, proof of compliance shall be furnished to the board.

The board shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the stated objectives and purposes and to enforce the provisions of this section, which shall include the methods of determining accredited programs, methods of determining compliancy, any fees, and such other rules consistent with this section as the board shall determine. This section and all rules adopted hereunder shall be uniformly applied by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 480, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 21; 2009, ch. 366, § 1.

43-15-25.2.
Educational requirements — Rules.

The board shall adopt rules establishing the educational requirements and quality control procedures for pharmacists who conduct laboratory tests provided in subsection 24 of section 43-15-01. These rules must include a requirement that pharmacists receive training for each specific test performed and a requirement that pharmacists demonstrate proficiency for each test performed following nationally recognized proficiency guidelines.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 378, § 2; 2007, ch. 363, § 4.

43-15-25.3.
Approved laboratory tests.

Approved laboratory tests are the following waived screening tests: glucose monitoring devices (FDA cleared/home use) 9221, cholesterol 1020, HDL cholesterol 2550, triglyceride 6118, glycosylated hemoglobin (Hgb A1C) 2204, and SARS-CoV-2. Additional tests may be added to this list as jointly determined by the board and the North Dakota board of medicine.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 378, § 3; 2015, ch. 297, § 15, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 171, § 2, effective April 22, 2021.

43-15-26.
Failure to renew license — Renewal fee — Cancellation of license — Reinstatement.

If a licensed pharmacist in this state fails to pay the fee for a renewal of a license within the time required, the secretary of the board shall mail the pharmacist a notice, addressed to the pharmacist’s last-known place of residence, notifying the pharmacist of failure to obtain a renewal license. The delinquent licenseholder, within sixty days after the notice is mailed, may procure a renewal license upon the payment of a renewal fee to be set by the board not to exceed one hundred dollars. If the licenseholder fails to have a license renewed within sixty days after the notice is mailed, the original or renewal license, as the case may be, becomes void and the registry thereof must be canceled. The board, on application of the delinquent licenseholder and upon the payment of all unpaid fees, may authorize the issuance of a new license without examination, if it is satisfied that the applicant is a proper individual to receive the same.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, §§ 10, 16; 1893, ch. 80, § 4; R.C. 1895, §§ 289, 291; R.C. 1899, §§ 289, 291; R.C. 1905, §§ 310, 312; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 21; C.L. 1913, § 495; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 43-1526; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 8; 1993, ch. 422, § 22; 2009, ch. 365, § 4.

43-15-27.
Change place of business — Record — Fee.

Every licensed pharmacist, within thirty days after changing a place of business as designated on the books of the board, shall notify the secretary of the board of the new place of business and shall accompany the notice with a fee to be set by the board not to exceed twenty-five dollars. Upon receipt of the fee and the notice of change of place of business, the secretary shall make the necessary change in the register and issue a receipt for the fee to the person sending it.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 22; C.L. 1913, § 496; R.C. 1943, § 43-1527; S.L. 1979, ch. 467, § 9; 1993, ch. 422, § 23.

43-15-28.
Certificate of registration canceled — Notice of hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 522, § 2.

43-15-28.1.
Temporary suspension — Appeal.

If the board has verified evidence that probable cause or grounds for discipline requires the suspension of a pharmacy permit or license of a pharmacist and if harm to the public is so imminent and critical that substantial harm could or would likely result if the permit or license is not suspended prior to a hearing, the board may order a temporary suspension ex parte.

An ex parte temporary suspension remains in effect for not more than sixty days, unless otherwise terminated by the board.

The board shall set the date of a full hearing on the cause and grounds for discipline regarding the permit or license for not later than sixty days from the issuance of the ex parte temporary suspension order. Within three days after the issuance of the ex parte suspension order, the board shall serve the pharmacy or pharmacist with a copy of the order along with a copy of the complaint and notice of the date set for the full hearing.

The pharmacy or pharmacist may appeal the ex parte temporary suspension order prior to the full hearing. For purposes of appeal, the district court shall decide whether probable cause or grounds for discipline reasonably requires the temporary suspension to adequately protect the public interest. The court shall give priority to the appeal for prompt disposition.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 522, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 24.

43-15-29.
False registration — Penalty.

Any person who procures or attempts to procure license as a pharmacist, for that person or any other person under this chapter, by making or causing to be made any false representations, or who falsely or fraudulently represents that the person is licensed, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, and in addition to the penalty imposed by the court, shall, if a licensed pharmacist, have the license canceled by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 24; C.L. 1913, § 498; R.C. 1943, § 43-1529; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 480; 1979, ch. 467, § 11; 1993, ch. 422, § 25.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-15-30.
Licensed pharmacist member of North Dakota pharmaceutical association. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 365, § 5.

43-15-31.
Prescriptions to be filed and preserved.

Every licensed pharmacist in the state shall file, or cause to be filed, any prescription, or a copy thereof, which has been compounded or dispensed in the pharmacist’s pharmacy or drugstore. The prescription or a copy of the prescription must be preserved for at least five years after it has been filled. The pharmacist may furnish a copy of any prescription to the party presenting it on the request of such party only.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 23; C.L. 1913, § 497; R.C. 1943, § 43-1531; 1987, ch. 520, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 27.

Cross-References.

Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.5.

43-15-31.1.
Patient profile record system.

A patient profile record system must be maintained in all pharmacies for persons for whom prescriptions are dispensed. The patient profile record system must be devised so as to enable the immediate retrieval of information necessary to enable the dispensing pharmacist to identify previously dispensed medication at the time a prescription is presented for dispensing. One profile card may be maintained for all members of a family living at the same address and possessing the same family name.

The following information must be recorded:

The family name and the first name of the person for whom the medication is intended, which is the patient.

The address of the patient.

An indication of the patient’s age group, e.g., infant, child, adult.

The original date the medication is dispensed pursuant to the receipt of a physician’s prescription.

The number or designation identifying the prescription.

The prescriber’s name.

The name, strength, and quantity of the drug dispensed.

The initials of the dispensing pharmacist, and the date of dispensing medication as a renewal (refill) if said initials and such date are not recorded on the back of the original prescription.

The pharmacist shall attempt to ascertain and shall record any allergies and idiosyncrasies of the patient and any chronic conditions which may relate to drug utilization as communicated to the pharmacy by the patient.

Upon receipt of a prescription, a pharmacist must examine the patient’s profile record before dispensing the medication to determine the possibility of a harmful drug interaction or reaction. Upon recognizing a potential harmful reaction or interaction, the pharmacist shall take appropriate action to avoid or minimize the problem which shall, if necessary, include consultation with the physician.

A patient profile record must be maintained for a period of not less than five years from the date of the last entry in the profile record.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 401, § 1.

Cross-References.

Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.5.

43-15-31.2.
Prescription drug information required.

With each prescription dispensed, the licensed pharmacist or the licensed intern pharmacist, in addition to labeling the prescription in accordance with law, must explain to the patient or the patient’s agent the directions for use and a warning of the potential harmful effect of combining any form of alcoholic beverage with the medication and any additional information, in writing if necessary, to assure the proper utilization of the medication or device prescribed. For those prescriptions delivered outside the confines of the pharmacy, the explanation must be by telephone or in writing, provided that this does not apply to those prescriptions for patients in hospitals or institutions where the medication is to be administered by a nurse or other individual licensed to administer medications, or to those prescriptions for patients who are to be discharged from a hospital or institution.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 402, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 28.

Cross-References.

Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.5.

Collateral References.

Civil liability of pharmacist or druggists for failure to warn of potential drug interactions in use of prescription drug, 79 A.L.R.5th 409.

43-15-31.3.
Oral transmission of prescriptions.

An oral transmission of a prescription drug may be accepted and dispensed by a pharmacist or licensed pharmacist intern if received from a practitioner, or a nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.1 who is authorized by the practitioner to orally transmit the prescription, or a registered dental hygienist or a registered dental assistant who is authorized by the supervising dentist to orally transmit the prescription. The practitioner shall document the order for oral transmission in the patient’s records. Only a licensed pharmacist or a licensed pharmacist intern or a registered pharmacy technician may receive an orally transmitted new or refill prescription.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 422, § 29; 1993, ch. 424, § 1; 1999, ch. 379, § 6; 2009, ch. 366, § 2.